Idaho, session 2026, H0746.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 1, Title 38, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 38-131C, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
38-131C. DEFICIENCY WARRANTS FOR COSTS OF PROVIDING FIRE RESOURCES
FOR NON-FIRE SUPPRESSION ACTIVITIES. (1) The state board of land commis-
sioners may authorize the issuance of deficiency warrants for the purpose of
paying the reimbursable costs of providing fire resources for non-wildland
fire suppression activities as mobilized by established wildland fire and
emergency management dispatch and deployment processes and procedures.
(2) When so authorized, the state controller shall draw deficiency war-
rants against the general fund.
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.